Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1443
Act; applicability.

The Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act shall not apply to any agreement between dealers and manufacturers that was entered into prior to October 1, 2026.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 2.
October 1, 2026